Arkansas, session 2025, SB325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-27-369(a) and (b), concerning the filing
of a motion to resume services for a parent whose parental rights were
previously terminated, are amended to read as follows:
(a) The Department of Human Services or an attorney ad litem may file
a motion to resume services for a parent whose parental rights were
previously terminated under this subchapter if following may file a motion to
resume services for a parent whose parental rights were previously terminated
under this subchapter:
(1) The child Department of Human Services:;
(A) Is not currently in the custody of the department;
(B) Is not in an adoptive placement, a pre-adoptive
*LJH138*
03-20-2025 14:11:32 LJH138

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 S3/20/25 SB325
placement, or under another permanent placement and there is some evidence
that the juvenile is not likely to achieve permanency within a reasonable
period of time as viewed from the child's perspective; or
(C) Was previously adopted, appointed a permanent
guardian, or placed in the permanent custody of another individual and the
adoption, guardianship, or custodial placement was disrupted or otherwise
dissolved; and
(2)(A) The order terminating the parental rights of the parent
who is the subject of a motion filed under this section was entered at least
three (3) years before the date on which the motion to resume services was
filed An attorney ad litem.; or
(B) The three-year waiting period may be waiver if it is
in the best interest of the child.
(3) A parent whose parental rights were previously terminated,
if the Executive Director of the Arkansas Commission for Parent Counsel
believes there is good cause to resume services and assign court-appointed
counsel to represent the parent.
(b)(1) A motion may be filed under this section shall identify and name
as a party the parent for whom services would resume if the child:
(A) Is currently in the custody of the department;
(B) Is not in an adoptive placement, a pre-adoptive
placement, or under another permanent placement and there is some evidence
that the juvenile is not likely to achieve permanency within a reasonable
period of time as viewed from the child's perspective; or
(C) Was previously adopted, appointed a permanent
guardian, or placed in the permanent custody of another individual and the
adoption, guardianship, or custodial placement was disrupted or otherwise
dissolved.; and
(2)(A) A parent shall not be named as a party to a motion filed
under this section The order terminating the parental rights of the parent
who is the subject of a motion filed under this section was entered at least
two (2) years before the date on which the motion to resume services was
filed.
(B) The two-year waiting period may be waived if the
waiver is in the best interest of the child.
(3) The petitioner shall serve the parent who is the subject of
03-20-2025 14:11:32 LJH138

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 S3/20/25 SB325
a motion filed under this section with the motion.
(4) A parent who is the subject of a motion filed under this
section shall have the right to be heard at a hearing on the motion.
(c)(1) A motion filed under this section shall:
(A) Be filed as a new juvenile case;
(B) Identify and name as a party the parent for whom services
would resume.
(d) The court may appoint an attorney to represent the parent subject
to the resumption of services motion.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-27-369(d)(2), regarding permissive orders
by a court when a motion for resumption of services for a parent whose
parental rights were terminated is granted, is amended to read as follows:
(2) If the court grants a motion filed under this section, the
court:
(A)(i) May order family services for the purposes of
assisting reunification between the child and a fit parent who is the subject
of the motion.
(ii) The court may order the parent to pay for some
or all of the costs associated with court-ordered family services;
(B)(i) May order studies, evaluations, home studies, or
post-disposition reports.
(ii) A written home study on the parent who is the
subject of the motion shall be submitted to the court before the court may
order unsupervised visitation or placement of the juvenile with the parent
The court may order unsupervised visitation or placement of the juvenile with
the parent without a written home study on the parent.
(iii) If a study, evaluation, or home study is
performed before a hearing on a motion filed under subsection (a) of this
section, the results of the study, evaluation, or home study shall be served
on the parent, attorney ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and any
other party to the motion at least two (2) business days before the hearing;
and

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-27-370 is amended to read as follows:
9-27-370. Reinstatement of parental rights.
03-20-2025 14:11:32 LJH138

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 S3/20/25 SB325
(a) The Department of Human Services, or an attorney ad litem, or a
parent who is represented by parent counsel under § 9-27-369(a) may file a
petition to reinstate the parental rights terminated under this subchapter if
the:
(1) Court has granted a motion to resume services under § 9-27-
369;
(2) Services have continued for at least one hundred eighty
(180) ninety (90) days following the date on which the court entered the
order granting a motion to resume services under § 9-27-369; and
(3) Parent for whom reinstatement of parental rights is sought
has substantially complied with the orders of the court and with the case
plan developed under § 9-27-369.
(b)(1) A petition to reinstate parental rights shall be filed in the
circuit court that: had
(A) Had jurisdiction over the petition to terminate the
parental rights of the parent who is the subject of the petition to reinstate
parental rights; or
(B) Has an open dependency-neglect case concerning the
child subject to the petition for reinstatement of parental rights.
(2) If the petition under subdivision (b)(1) of this section is
filed in the court with the pending dependency-neglect case, the court may
communicate with the court that terminated the parent's parental rights.
(c) A petition filed under this section shall be served on the:
(1) Attorney ad litem;
(2) Department;
(3) Parent who is the subject of the petition;
(4) Court Appointed Special Advocate Program Director, if
applicable; and
(5) Child's tribe, if applicable.
(d) At least seven (7) business days before a hearing on a petition
filed under this section, the department shall provide the parent, parent's
counsel, attorney ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and any other
party to the petition with a written report that includes information on:
(1) The efforts made by the department to achieve adoption or
another permanent placement for the child, including without limitation any
barriers to the adoption or permanent placement of the child;
03-20-2025 14:11:32 LJH138

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 S3/20/25 SB325
(2) The extent to which the parent who is the subject of the
petition has complied with the case plan and orders of the court as of the
date on which services were ordered to be resumed under § 9-27-369;
(3) The impact of the resumed services on the parent and on the
health, safety, and well-being of the child; and
(4) Any recommendations of the department.
(e)(1) The court may grant custody of the child to the parent whose
parental rights were terminated if the court finds an award of custody to be
in the best interest of the child, regardless of whether a home study was
conducted on the parent whose parental rights were terminated or whether the
court:
(A) Finds that the parent shall continue services; or
(B) Has not yet reinstated the parental rights of the
parent whose parental rights were terminated.
(2) If a court grants custody under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section, a home evaluation shall be conducted on the parent whose parental
rights were previously terminated in lieu of a traditional home study.
(e)(f) Parental rights may be reinstated under this section if the
court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:
(1)(A) Reinstatement of parental rights is in the best
interest of the child; and
(2)(B) There has been a material change in circumstances
as to the parent who is the subject of the petition since the date on which
the order terminating the parental rights of the parent was entered; or
(2) The child of the parent whose parental rights were
terminated:
(A) Was in foster care at the time he or she reached
eighteen (18) years of age;
(B) Is between the age of eighteen (18) years of age and
twenty-one (21) years of age; and
(C) Is currently in foster care and is under the court's
jurisdiction under § 9-27-306.
(f)(g) The court shall consider the following factors when determining
whether a reinstatement of parental rights is in the best interest of the
child:
(1) The likelihood of the child achieving permanency through
03-20-2025 14:11:32 LJH138

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 S3/20/25 SB325
adoption or another permanent placement;
(2) The age, maturity, and preference of the child concerning
the reinstatement of parental rights;
(3) The parent's fitness and whether the parent has remedied the
conditions that existed at the time of the termination of his or her parental
rights; and
(4) The effect that the reinstatement of parental rights would
have on the health, safety, and well-being of the child.
(g)(h) A court may deny a petition filed under this section if the
court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the parent engaged in
conduct that interfered with the child's ability to achieve permanency.
(h)(i) An order reinstating the parental rights of the parent who is
the subject of a petition filed under this section restores all rights,
powers, privileges, immunities, duties, and obligations of the parent as to
the child, including without limitation custody, control, and support of the
child.
(i)(j) If the child is placed with a parent whose parental rights are
reinstated under this section, the court shall not close the case until the
child has resided with the parent for no less than six (6) months.
(j)(k) A written order shall be filed by the court, a party, or the
attorney of a party as designated by the court within thirty (30) days of the
date of the hearing on the motion to reinstate parental rights or before the
next hearing, whichever is sooner.
(k)(l) An order reinstating parental rights under this section does
not:
(1) Vacate or affect the validity of a previous order
terminating the parental rights of the parent who is the subject of the
petition; and
(2) Restore or impact the rights of a parent who is not the
subject of a petition filed under this section.
(l)(m) This section is retroactive and applies to a child who is under
the jurisdiction of a court at the time of a hearing on a petition to
terminate parental rights, regardless of the date on which parental rights
were terminated by court order.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 12-18-902 is amended to read as follows:
03-20-2025 14:11:32 LJH138

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 S3/20/25 SB325
12-18-902. Contents.
(a)(1) The Child Maltreatment Central Registry shall contain records
of cases on all true investigative determinations of: child maltreatment
(A) Abuse;
(B) Sexual abuse;
(C) Sexual exploitation; and
(D) Neglect, if the neglect occurred in the course of
employment as a:
(i) Teacher;
(ii) Teacher's aide;
(iii) Substitute teacher;
(iv) School principal;
(v) Employee of a child welfare agency;
(vi) Foster parent;
(vii) Employee of a juvenile detention facility;
(viii) Employee of a psychiatric residential
treatment facility;
(ix) Employee of a hospital;
(x) Nurse;
(xi) Nurse's aide;
(xii) Licensed social worker;
(xiii) Doctor;
(xiv) Therapist; or
(ix) Any individual who works directly with a
vulnerable population in a professional or caretaking capacity; and
(E)(i) Neglect, when a court finds the child to be a
dependent-neglected juvenile because of the neglect.
(ii) Should reunification be achieved, the parent
shall be removed from the registry if there are no additional true
investigative determinations and it has been more than one (1) year since
reunification.
(b) The Child Maltreatment Central Registry shall not contain records
of cases on investigative determinations abandonment.

/s/A. Clark

03-20-2025 14:11:32 LJH138